Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-4,118.07
Applicant for Class O or Class M license; issuance of LPD-learner's permit; restriction on reapplication for license.

An applicant for a Class O or Class M license that fails three successive tests of his or her ability to drive and maneuver a motor vehicle safely as provided in subdivision (3)(b) of section 60-4,114 may be issued an LPD-learner's permit. The applicant shall not be eligible to reapply for the Class O or Class M license and retake such test until he or she presents proof of successful completion of a department-approved driver training school or until he or she has held an LPD-learner's permit for at least ninety days.

Laws 2011, LB158, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2021), § 60-4,114.01;

Laws 2026, LB972, § 58.
July 18, 2026